Missouri, session 2026, SB1652.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 210 and 595, RSMo, are amended by
adding thereto two new sections, to be known as sections
210.1017 and 595.326, to read as follows:
210.1017. 1. There is hereby created a statewide
program called the "Phoenix Alert System" referred to in
this section as the "system" to aid in the identification
and location of abducted or missing African American women
and girls.
2. For the purposes of this section, "abducted or
missing African American women and girls" means an African
American woman or girl whose whereabouts are unknown and who
is:
(1) Reasonably believed to be the victim of the
offense of kidnapping as defined by section 565.110,
565.120, or 565.130 as determined by local law enforcement;
(2) Reasonably believed to be the victim of the
offense of child kidnapping as defined by section 565.115 as
determined by local law enforcement;
(3) Reasonably believed to be a victim of parental
kidnapping as defined by section 565.153 as determined by
local law enforcement; or


(4) Reasonably believed to be a victim of an offense
of trafficking pursuant to sections 566.206, 566.209,
566.210, or 566.211.
3. The department of public safety shall develop
regions to provide the system. The office of missing and
murdered African American women and girls and department of
public safety shall coordinate local law enforcement
agencies and public commercial television and radio
broadcasters to provide an effective system. In the event
that a local law enforcement agency opts not to set up a
system and an abduction occurs within the jurisdiction, it
shall notify the office of missing and murdered African
American women and girls who shall notify local media in the
region.
4. All regions shall be notified within one hour of
receipt of a report of a missing or murdered African
American woman or girl. Each region shall immediately
disseminate notifications to law enforcement and media
outlets within the regions.
5. The Phoenix alert system shall include all state
agencies capable of providing urgent and timely information
to the public together with broadcasters and other private
entities that volunteer to participate in the dissemination
of urgent public information. At a minimum, the Phoenix
alert system shall include the office of missing and
murdered African American women and girls, department of
public safety, highway patrol, department of transportation,
department of health and senior services, and Missouri
lottery commission.
6. Participation in an Phoenix alert system is at the
option of local law enforcement agencies and federally
licensed radio and television broadcasters.


7. The department of public safety shall update
notifications sent under this section whenever new
information becomes available, and every month for the first
year after the initial notification. One year after the
first notification, the department shall make updates every
three months.
8. Any person who knowingly makes a false report that
triggers an alert pursuant to this section is guilty of a
class A misdemeanor.
595.326. 1. The director of the department of public
safety shall establish and maintain an office dedicated to
preventing and ending the targeting of African American
women and girls within the Missouri department of public
safety.
2. (1) The director shall appoint an executive
director for the office who is a person closely connected to
the African American community and who is highly
knowledgeable about criminal investigations. The director
is encouraged to consider candidates for appointment who are
recommended by members of the African American community.
The director shall hire a qualified executive director no
later than December 31, 2026.
(2) The executive director may select, appoint, and
compensate out of available funds assistants and employees
as necessary to discharge the office's responsibilities.
3. (1) The office has the following duties:
(a) Advocate for legislation that will facilitate the
accomplishment of mandates identified in the report of the
task force on missing and murdered African American women;
(b) Advocate for state agencies to take actions to
facilitate the accomplishment of mandates identified in the
report of the task force on missing and murdered African
American women;


(c) Develop recommendations for legislative and agency
actions to address injustice in the criminal justice
system's response to cases of missing and murdered African
American women and girls;
(d) Facilitate research to refine the mandates in the
report of the task force on missing and murdered African
American women and to assess the potential efficacy,
feasibility, and impact of the recommendations;
(e) Collect data on missing person and homicide cases
involving African American women and girls, including the
total number of cases, the rate at which the cases are
solved, the length of time the cases remain open, and a
comparison to similar cases involving different demographic
groups;
(f) Collect data on Amber alerts, including the total
number of Amber alerts issued, the total number of Amber
alerts that involve African American girls, and the outcome
of cases involving Amber alerts disaggregated by the child's
race and sex;
(g) Collect data on reports of missing African
American girls, including the number classified as voluntary
runaways, and a comparison to similar cases involving
different demographic groups;
(h) Analyze and assess the intersection between cases
involving missing and murdered African American women and
girls and labor trafficking and sex trafficking;
(i) Develop recommendations for legislative, agency,
and community actions to address the intersection between
cases involving missing and murdered African American women
and girls and labor trafficking and sex trafficking;
(j) Analyze and assess the intersection between cases
involving murdered African American women and girls and
domestic violence, including prior instances of domestic


violence within the family or relationship, whether an
offender had prior convictions for domestic assault or
related offenses, and whether the offender used a firearm in
the murder or any prior instances of domestic assault;
(k) Develop recommendations for legislative, agency,
and community actions to address the intersection between
cases involving murdered African American women and girls
and domestic violence;
(l) Develop tools and processes to evaluate the
implementation and impact of the efforts of the office;
(m) Track and collect Missouri data on missing and
murdered African American women and girls, and provide
statistics upon public or legislative inquiry;
(n) Facilitate technical assistance for local and
state law enforcement agencies during active cases involving
missing and murdered African American women and girls;
(o) Conduct case reviews and report on the results of
case reviews for the following types of cases involving
missing and murdered African American women and girls: cold
cases for missing African American women and girls and death
investigation review for cases of African American women and
girls ruled as suicide or overdose under suspicious
circumstances;
(p) Conduct case reviews of the prosecution and
sentencing for cases where a perpetrator committed a violent
or exploitative crime against an African American woman or
girl. These case reviews shall identify those cases where
the perpetrator is a repeat offender;
(q) Prepare draft legislation as necessary to allow
the office access to the data necessary for the office to
conduct the reviews required in this section and advocate
for passage of that legislation;


(r) Review sentencing guidelines for crimes related to
missing and murdered African American women and girls,
recommend changes if needed, and advocate for consistent
implementation of the guidelines across Missouri courts;
(s) Develop and maintain communication with relevant
divisions in the department of public safety regarding any
cases involving missing and murdered African American women
and girls and on procedures for investigating cases
involving missing and murdered African American women and
girls;
100 (t) Coordinate, as relevant, with federal efforts, and
101 efforts in neighboring states;
102 (u) Coordinate with the department of public safety,
103 law enforcement agencies, public commercial television, and
104 radio broadcasters to facilitate the implementation and
105 operation of the Phoenix alert system.
106 (2) As used in this subdivision, the following terms
107 mean:
108 (a) "Labor trafficking":
109 a. The recruitment, transportation, transfer,
110 harboring, enticement, provision, obtaining, or receipt of a
111 person by any means, in furtherance of:
112 (i) Debt bondage;
113 (ii) Forced or coerced labor or services;
114 (iii) Slavery or practices similar to slavery; or
115 (iv) The removal of organs through the use of coercion
116 or intimidation; or
117 b. Receiving profit or anything of value, knowing or
118 having reason to know it is derived from an act described in
119 subparagraph a. of this paragraph;
120 (b) "Sex trafficking":


121 a. Receiving, recruiting, enticing, harboring,
122 providing, or obtaining by any means an individual to aid in
123 the prostitution of the individual; or
124 b. Receiving profit or anything of value, knowing or
125 having reason to know it is derived from an act described in
126 subparagraph a. of this paragraph.
127 4. In fulfilling its duties, the office may
128 coordinate, as useful, with stakeholder groups that were
129 represented on the task force on missing and murdered
130 African American women and girls and state agencies that are
131 responsible for the systems that play a role in
132 investigating, prosecuting, and adjudicating cases involving
133 violence committed against African American women and girls;
134 those who have a role in supporting or advocating for
135 missing or murdered African American women and girls and the
136 people who seek justice for them; and those who represent
137 the interests of African American people. This includes the
138 following entities: Missouri Police Chiefs Association;
139 Missouri Sheriffs' Association; Missouri Peace Officers
140 Association; Missouri Association of Prosecuting Attorneys;
141 United States Attorney's Office; juvenile courts; Missouri
142 Coroners' and Medical Examiners' Association; United States
143 Coast Guard; state agencies, including the departments of
144 health and senior services, elementary and secondary
145 education, corrections, and public safety; service providers
146 who offer legal services, advocacy, and other services to
147 African American women and girls; African American women and
148 girls who are survivors; and organizations and leadership
149 from urban and statewide African American communities.
150 5. The office shall report on measurable outcomes
151 achieved to meet its statutory duties, along with specific
152 objectives and outcome measures proposed for the following
153 year. The report shall include data and statistics on


154 missing and murdered African American women and girls in
155 Missouri, including names, dates of disappearance, and dates
156 of death, to the extent the data is publicly available. The
157 office shall submit the report by January fifteenth each
158 year to the chairs and ranking minority members of the
159 legislative committees with primary jurisdiction over public
160 safety.
161 6. There is hereby created in the state treasury the
162 "Missing and Murdered African American Women and Girls
163 Fund", which shall consist of moneys appropriated by the
164 general assembly, gifts, and grants. The state treasurer
165 shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections
166 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve
167 disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and money
168 in the fund shall be used solely by the director of public
169 safety for the purposes authorized by this section.
170 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the
171 contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end of the
172 biennium shall not revert to the credit of the general
173 revenue fund. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in
174 the fund in the same manner as other funds are invested.
175 Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
176 credited to the fund.
177 7. (1) The office shall issue grants to community-
178 based organizations that provide services designed to
179 prevent or end the targeting of African American women or
180 girls, or to provide assistance to victims of offenses that
181 targeted African American women or girls.
182 (2) Grant recipients shall use money to:
183 (a) Provide services designed to reduce or prevent
184 crimes or other negative behaviors that target African
185 American women or girls;


186 (b) Provide training to the community about how to
187 handle situations and crimes involving the targeting of
188 African American women and girls, including, but not limited
189 to, training for law enforcement officers, county attorneys,
190 city attorneys, judges, and other criminal justice partners;
191 or
192 (c) Provide services to African American women and
193 girls who are victims of crimes or other offenses, or to the
194 family members of missing and murdered African American
195 women and girls.
196 (3) Applicants shall apply in a form and manner
197 established by the office.
198 (4) Grant recipients shall provide an annual report to
199 the office that includes:
200 (a) The services provided by the grant recipient;
201 (b) The number of individuals served in the previous
202 year; and
203 (c) Any other information required by the office.
204 (5) On or before February first of each year, the
205 office shall report to the legislative committees of the
206 general assembly with jurisdiction over public safety on the
207 work of grant recipients, including a description of the
208 number of entities awarded grants, the amount of those
209 grants, and the number of individuals served by the grantees.
210 8. The office shall have access to corrections data
211 and medical data maintained by an agency and classified as
212 private data on individuals or confidential data on
213 individuals to the extent the data is necessary for the
214 office to perform its duties under this section.